Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4143.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 695. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this section, the revenue collected under this part shall must be distributed to the general fund. If the amendatory act that added section 51h takes effect before April 18, 2023, then for the 2021-2022 state fiscal year only, from the tax levied under this part, $800,000,000.00 of the revenue collected is appropriated and must be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Michigan taxpayer rebate fund created in section 51h, and the balance of the revenue collected under this part for that state fiscal year shall be deposited to the general fund. (2) Beginning with the 2022-2023 state fiscal year through the 2024-2025 state fiscal year, from the tax levied under this part, the revenue collected under this part shall must be deposited in the following manner: (a) Up to $1,200,000,000.00 to the general fund. (b) After the deposit under subdivision (a), up to $50,000,000.00, if available, to the Michigan housing and community development fund created in section 58a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458a. (c) After the deposits under subdivisions (a) and (b), up to $50,000,000.00, if available, to the revitalization and placemaking fund created in section 696. (d) After the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), up to $500,000,000.00, if available, to the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254. (e) The balance of any revenue collected under this part after the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), to the general fund. (3) Beginning with For the 2025-2026 state fiscal year only, from the tax levied under this part, $50,000,000.00 of the revenue collected under this part shall must be deposited to the Michigan housing and community development fund created in section 58a of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458a, and the balance of the revenue collected under this part for that state fiscal year shall be deposited to the general fundin the following manner: (a) Up to $500,000,000.00 to the department of transportation for county road commissions of this state. Funds distributed to county road commissions under this subparagraph must be distributed among county road commissions in accordance with section 12 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.662. (b) After the deposit under subdivision (a), up to $500,000,000.00 to the department of transportation for cities and villages of this state. Funds distributed to cities and villages under this subparagraph must be distributed among cities and villages in accordance with section 13 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663. (c) The balance of any revenue after the deposits under subdivisions (a) and (b), into the state treasury to the credit of the Michigan transportation fund created in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660, and disbursed as provided in section 10(1)(l) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (4) Beginning with the 2026-2027 state fiscal year, from the tax levied under this part, the revenue collected under this part must be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Michigan transportation fund created in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660, and disbursed as provided in section 10(1)(l) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660.